Maine, session 132, LD941.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §600-C is enacted to read:
§600-C. Posting of wage ranges
1. Wage range disclosure requirement. An employer that employs 10 or more
employees shall include a range of prospective wages in any public or Internet job posting
for a position of employment in the State. The wage range must reflect the employer's good
faith estimate of the compensation that the employer reasonably expects to pay an
employee filling the position at the time of posting.
2. Advisory nature of posting. A wage range posted pursuant to subsection 1 is
advisory and not binding on the employer. An employer acting in good faith may pay
compensation for a position outside of the wage range posted for the position based upon
factors such as market conditions or the experience or education of the employee.
3. Enforcement. The Department of Labor shall enforce this section.
4. Violations. A person that violates this section is subject to a penalty not to exceed
$500.